Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-801
Nebraska certificate to administer; required of administrators and supervisors.

All persons holding the official title of (1) superintendent of schools, (2) principal or supervisor of an accredited school, or (3) supervisor of any special subjects or subject in which such persons actually supervise the work of other teachers in that subject or those subjects shall hold a Nebraska certificate to administer.

Laws 1937, c. 184, § 3, p. 728;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-1303;

R.S.1943, § 79-1329;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 329, p. 801;

Laws 1957, c. 355, § 18, p. 1212;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1229;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 431;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 4.

Private, denominational, or parochial schools which elect not to meet accreditation or approval requirements, persons who monitor instruction, see section 79-1601.